Washington statutes.
RCW 11.08.260

Payment of escheated funds to claimant.

In the event the order of the court requires the payment of escheated funds or the proceeds of the sale of escheated real property or the appraised value of escheated property transferred for park purposes, a certified copy of such order shall be served upon the department of revenue which shall thereupon take any steps necessary to effect payment to the claimant out of the general fund of the state.

[ 1993 c 49 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 9; 1965 c 145 s 11.08.260. Prior: 1955 c 254 s 14.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 278: See notes following RCW 11.08.160.